Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 10.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-947.04
Annual benefit adjustment; minimum accrual rate.

The minimum accrual rate is eighteen dollars until adjusted pursuant to this section. Commencing June 30, 1999, the retirement board shall annually adjust the minimum accrual rate to reflect the cumulative percentage change in the National Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers factor published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor from the last adjustment of the minimum accrual rate.

Laws 1998, LB 532, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 703, § 15;

Laws 2008, LB1147, § 10.